California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 this program may be qualified to receive a grant in an amount, up to and including, the applicable amount listed in paragraph (3). However, the grant eligibility of a county may be terminated at the discretion of the Department of Finance if a county does not meet the conditions specified in paragraph (4).

(2) The resolution to participate in this program shall include a detailed listing of the proposed uses by the county of the grant moneys, including, but not limited to:

(A) The proposed positions to be funded.

(B) Any increased automation costs.

(C) The specific tasks and functions that will be performed during the fiscal year with these funds.

(3) Upon transmittal of the electing
 resolution by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall, provided sufficient moneys have been appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this section, provide a grant to the electing county for the applicable amount specified in the following schedule:JurisdictionAmount Alameda $ 2,152,429Alpine 3,124Amador 80,865Butte 381,956Calaveras 109,897Colusa 53,957Contra Costa 2,022,088Del Norte 36,203El Dorado 302,795Fresno 1,165,249Glenn 59,197Humboldt 210,806Imperial 231,673Inyo 100,080Kern 1,211,318Kings 138,653Lake 117,376Lassen 54,699Los Angeles 13,451,670Madera 212,991Marin 790,490Mariposa 46,476Mendocino 160,435Merced 298,004Modoc 24,022Mono 47,778Monterey 795,819Napa 366,020Nevada 234,292Orange 6,826,325Placer 628,047Plumas 80,606Riverside 2,358,068Sacramento 1,554,245San Benito 90,408San Bernardino 2,139,938San Diego 5,413,943San Francisco 1,013,332San Joaquin 818,686San Luis Obispo 736,288San Mateo 2,220,001Santa
 Barbara 926,817Santa Clara 4,213,639Santa Cruz 565,328Shasta 342,399Sierra 7,383Siskiyou 91,164Solano 469,207Sonoma 1,035,049Stanislaus 866,155Sutter 147,436Tehama 97,222Trinity 24,913Tulare 501,907Tuolumne 126,067Ventura 1,477,789Yolo 278,309Yuba 88,968(4) The Department of Finance shall consider the following items in determining whether a county may continue to receive a grant under this section:

(A) The county’s performance as indicated by the State Board of Equalization’s sample survey required by Section 15640 of the Government Code.

(B) Any performance measures adopted by the California Assessors’ Association, the California Association of Clerks and Elections Officials, the State Association of County Auditor-Controllers, and the California Association of County Treasurers and Tax Collectors.

(C) The county’s reduction of backlogs of assessment appeals and declines in taxable value below adjusted base year value.

(D) The county’s compliance with mandatory audits required by Section 469 or the county’s delivery of tax bills as required by Section 2610.5.

(E) The county’s reduction of backlogs of determinations regarding new construction, changes in ownership, and supplemental assessments.

(F) Any other measure, as
 determined by the Director of Finance and transmitted to a county prior to its receiving a grant.

(d) (1) Funds appropriated for purposes of this section shall be used to enhance the property tax administration system. Amounts provided to any county as a grant pursuant to this section may not be used to supplant the current level of county funding for property tax administration, exclusive of funds received pursuant to the predecessor State-County Property Tax Loan Program. In order to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Grant Program, a participating county shall maintain a base staffing, including contract staff, and total funding level in the county assessor’s office, independent of the grant proceeds provided pursuant to this section, equal to the levels in the 1994–95 fiscal year, exclusive of amounts provided to the assessor’s office pursuant to Item 9100-102-001 of the Budget Act of 1994.
 However, in a county in which the 1994–95 fiscal year funding level for the assessor’s office was higher than the 1993–94 fiscal year level, the 1993–94 fiscal year staffing and funding levels shall be considered the base year for purposes of this section. If a county was otherwise eligible but was unable to participate in the State-County Property Tax Loan Program in the 1995–96 fiscal year because it did not meet the funding level and staffing requirements of this paragraph, that county shall maintain a base staffing, including contract staff, and total funding level in the county assessor’s office equal to the levels in the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(2) Prior to the assessor’s recommendation for participation in the State-County Property Tax Administration Grant Program, the assessor shall consult with the county tax collector, and any other county agency directly involved in property tax administration, to develop an identifiable plan for the
 use of these funds during the period specified in the resolution by the board of supervisors. This plan shall be subject to modification and approval of the board of supervisors.

(e) In any fiscal year in which the assessor of a county elects not to participate in the grant program or submits to the board of supervisors a grant proposal that is less than the applicable amount specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), any other department of that county that is responsible for the administration, allocation, or adjudication of property tax, as defined in Section 95.3, may submit to the board of supervisors an application for the remainder of the allowable grant amount set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c). Any grant proposal submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall include the information specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and will be subject to the performance standards set forth in paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (c).

(f) If the funds appropriated by any Budget Act for the purposes set forth in this section exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000), the excess shall be allocated among participating counties in proportion to each county’s applicable grant share listed in the schedule set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c). Any additional funds allocated pursuant to this subdivision shall be transferred by the Controller to the boards of supervisors of participating counties at the same time as the transfer of funds pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), and the funds transferred shall be available for allocation by the board of supervisors within the county only for the purposes of administration, allocation, or adjudication of property taxes, as defined in Section 95.3. Any county receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision shall be required to comply with the same reporting requirements as those required for grant funds received
 pursuant to subdivision (c).

(g) A participating county may establish a tracking system whereby a work or function number is assigned to each appraisal or administrative activity. This tracking system should provide statistical data on the number of production units performed by the county and the positive and negative change in assessed value attributable to the activities performed by each employee.

(h) At the request of the Department of Finance, the State Board of Equalization shall assist the Department of Finance in evaluating grants made pursuant to this section.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 95.3, any funds provided to an eligible county pursuant to this section shall not result in any reduction of those county property tax administrative costs that are reimbursable pursuant to Section 95.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

95.4.

Amounts invoiced pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95.2 or its predecessor shall not include the amount of any costs incurred by the county auditor pursuant to Section 33672.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

95.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) In recognition of the fact that over 50 percent of annual property tax revenues accrue to K–14 schools and county offices of education, and thereby help to offset the state’s General Fund obligation to those entities, the state has a vested financial interest in ensuring that county assessors have the resources necessary to fairly and efficiently administer the county property tax rolls. Fair and efficient administration includes, but is not limited to, the expeditious enrollment of properties that are newly constructed or that change ownership, the timely levying of supplemental assessments when ownership changes occur, the timely reassessment of property to reflect market values, and the defense of
 assessed valuations that county assessors believe have been improperly appealed.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a three-year pilot program limited to nine competitively selected county assessors’ offices to quantify the benefit of providing county assessors with state grants to improve their ability to discharge these, and related essential duties.

(3) The success of the pilot program shall be determined based on whether the assessment activities funded with pilot program funds in each county have enhanced countywide equalization by properly valuing property, and have thereby generated property tax revenues for K–14 schools and county offices of education in an amount that is not less than the total amount of General Fund revenues expended to fund the pilot program in each participating county.

(b) For the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2016–17 fiscal year, inclusive, there is hereby created the State-County Assessors’ Partnership Agreement Program, to be administered by the Department of Finance.

(1) Program funding shall be subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act. The program shall be inoperative in any fiscal year in which an appropriation is not provided.

(2) Each participating county shall annually match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, the program funds apportioned to their county assessor’s office.

(3) Program funds provided to participating county assessors shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funding. For purposes of this paragraph, base staffing and funding levels shall be calculated as of June 30, 2014, unless otherwise authorized by the Department of
 Finance.

(4) (A) The costs paid under the program shall be both of the following:

(i) Actual administrative costs for purposes of Section 75.60.

(ii) Property tax administrative costs for purposes of Section 95.3.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “costs paid under the program” includes both of the following:

(i) Program funds provided to participating county assessor’s offices by the state.

(ii) Matching funds provided by the county.

(c) All counties shall be eligible to apply to participate in the program. However, the Department of
 Finance shall limit program participation as follows:

(1) (A) No more than two program participants shall be selected from counties of the first or second class, inclusive, as defined in Sections 28022 and 28023 of the Government Code.

(B) Each county selected from within the classes specified in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible to receive at least 25 percent of the amount annually appropriated for the program, not to exceed one million eight hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($1,875,000).

(C) If the number of approved program participants is not sufficient to meet the number of participants allowed under subparagraph (A), the number of program participants under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) may be increased by the remaining number of participants from this paragraph. The remaining
 funds will be added to the funds available within subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) so that the total program funds will be available for distribution equally among the participants in paragraph (2).

(2) (A) No more than four program participants shall be selected from counties of the 3rd to 12th classes, inclusive, as defined in Sections 28024 to 28033, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(B) Each county selected from within the classes specified in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible to receive at least 11 percent of the amount annually appropriated for the program, not to exceed eight hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($825,000).

(C) If the number of approved program participants is not sufficient to meet the number of participants allowed under subparagraph (A), the number of program
 participants under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) may be increased by the remaining number of participants from this paragraph. The remaining funds will be added to the funds available within subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) so that the total program funds set aside will be available for distribution equally among the participants in paragraph (3).

(3) (A) No more than three program participants shall be selected from counties of the 13th to 58th classes, inclusive, as defined in Sections 28034 to 28079, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(B) Each county selected from within the classes specified in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible to receive at least 2 percent of the amount annually appropriated for the program, not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(4) County
 populations for purposes of this subdivision shall be determined based on the most recent January estimate by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(d) County assessors’ offices that elect to apply to participate in the program shall do all the following on or before September 15, 2014:

(1) Transmit to the Department of Finance a resolution of the county board of supervisors that states the county agrees to provide the assessor’s office with matching funds, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, in each year that the assessor’s office participates in the program.

(2) Submit to the Department of Finance an application, in the form and manner specified by Department of Finance. The Department of Finance may reject applications not received by the specified date. At a minimum, the application shall include
 the following:

(A) The staff the county assessor proposes to fund using program funds and matching county funds.

(B) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated
 countywide backlog of newly constructed real property that has not yet been enrolled and the estimated rate at which the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will enroll that property.

(C) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated
 countywide backlog of real property that has changed ownership and not yet been reassessed and the estimated dollar value of that real property.

(D) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated countywide backlog of supplemental
 assessments that have not been issued and the estimated dollar value of those assessments.

(E) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated countywide backlog of real properties that have not been reassessed upon modification and the
 estimated dollar value that those modifications will add to the county property tax roll.

(F) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated countywide backlog of escaped assessments and the estimated dollar value of those
 assessments.

(G) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will add to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated countywide backlog of properties that have not been reassessed to market value subsequent to having their assessed values reduced and the estimated dollar value of those reassessments.

(H) The estimated number of assessment appeals to which the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will respond in accordance with subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value retained on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The number of assessment appeals to which the county assessor was unable to respond due to staffing shortages in the 2013–14 fiscal year, and the dollar amount by which the county property tax roll was consequently reduced.

(I) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s office staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated amount resulting in change to the county property tax roll due to additional audits completed pursuant to Sections 469 and 470 and the estimated dollar value of those assessments.

(J) The estimated value that the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will result in a change to the county property tax roll pursuant to work performed in accordance with subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). This information shall be provided for each of the three fiscal years that the program is authorized to operate. The application shall separately state each of the following:

(i) The dollar value changed on the county property tax roll by county assessor’s staff in the 2013–14 fiscal year through performance of the tasks described in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(ii) The estimated amount resulting in a change to the county property tax roll due to discovering taxable property pursuant to Sections 405 and 531, the estimated dollar value of those assessments, and the
 estimated rate at which the staff identified in subparagraph (A) will issue those assessments.

(K) State the amount of program funds and county matching funds that the county assessor proposes to expend for each of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (f).

(e) (1) The Department of Finance shall review the applications, select the program participants on the strength of those applications, and notify the participants of their selection no later than October 15, 2014. No later than October 22, 2014, and each October 22 thereafter while the program is operative, the Department of Finance shall instruct the office of the State Controller to remit to each participating county the appropriate sum in accordance with subdivision (c).

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of
 Finance seek to ensure that the applicants selected to participate in the program consist of a representative cross section of the state’s county assessor’s offices. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Finance consider factors other than revenue generating potential when reviewing applications.

(f) County assessors’ offices shall use program funds only for the following purposes, provided that the funds may be used for additional, related purposes upon the receipt of specific authorization from the Department of Finance:

(1) The payment of salaries and benefits to assessor’s office staff hired or otherwise funded subsequent to the Department of Finance’s approval of the assessor’s program participation application pursuant to subdivision (d), to assist with the following activities:

(A) Assessing and enrolling newly constructed real property.

(B) Reassessing real property that has changed ownership.

(C) Processing supplemental assessments for real property that has changed ownership.

(D) Reassessing existing real property that has been modified in a way that changes its current assessed value.

(E) Reassessing real and personal property that has escaped assessment, as defined in Section 531.

(F) Reassessing to current market value those real properties for which the county assessor previously reduced the assessed valuation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIII A of the Constitution.

(G) Responding to real property assessment appeals pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 1601) of Division 1.

(H) Conducting property tax audits pursuant to Sections 469 and 470.

(I) Discovering real and personal property not previously assessed.

(2) Procuring office space for staff hired pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Procuring office supplies and related items for staff hired pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Procuring information technology systems and software to assist with the activities specified in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1) by increasing efficiencies and effectiveness of property tax administration, and allowing for appropriate
 utilization of program receipts. For purposes of this paragraph, “information technology systems and software” shall exclude desktop computers, portable computers, tablet computers, and mobile phones, unless specifically authorized by the Department of Finance.

(g) No later than April 15, 2015, and each subsequent April 15 that the program is operative, each participating county assessor’s office shall report the following information to the Department of Finance in the form and manner specified by the Department of Finance:

(1) The matching funds provided by the county in the fiscal year.

(2) A status report for completing the assessment activities using program funds and county matching funds to meet the benchmarks specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) in the next fiscal year.

(h) No later than September 15, 2015, and each subsequent September 15 that the program is operative, each participating county assessor’s office shall report the following information to the Department of Finance in the form and manner specified by the Department of Finance:

(1) (A) The matching funds provided by the county in the fiscal year.

(B) If the matching funds provided by the county are less than the amount determined for that year by the Department of Finance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Director of Finance shall immediately terminate the county’s participation in the program.

(2) The number of staff whose salaries and benefits were paid in full with program grant funds and with county matching funds in
 the fiscal year.

(3) The number of properties assessed and enrolled in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the total assessed value of those properties. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of properties assessed and enrolled in the fiscal year using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total assessed value of those properties.

(4) The number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the total roll value of those reassessments. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year using
 the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total roll value of those reassessments.

(5) The number of supplemental assessments enrolled in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the total roll value of those supplemental assessments. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of supplemental assessments enrolled in the fiscal year using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total roll value of those supplemental assessments.

(6) The number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) and the total roll
 value of those reassessments. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total roll value of those reassessments.

(7) The number of escaped assessments enrolled in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the total roll value of those assessments. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of escaped assessments enrolled in the fiscal year using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total roll value of those assessments.

(8) The number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (F) of
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), and the total roll value of those reassessments. If applicable, the county assessor shall separately report the number of properties reassessed in the fiscal year using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) and the total roll value of those reassessments.

(9) The number of assessment appeals successfully responded to in the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) and the total value retained on the roll as a result. For purposes of this paragraph, “successfully responded to” means the assessment appeals board did not reduce the assessed value to that claimed by the appellant.

(10) The additional number of property tax audits completed in
 the fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) and the total value retained on the roll as a result. For purposes of this paragraph, additional audits refers to the number greater than the required volume of pool audits pursuant to Section 469.

(11) The number of properties discovered pursuant subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) by the staff identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) and the total value retained on the roll as a result.

(i) The Department of Finance shall annually review the information submitted pursuant to subdivision (g), and shall determine for each county whether the work performed using program funds and county matching funds has met the benchmarks specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Subsequent to the provision of 30 days’ notice to
 the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Director of Finance may terminate the participation of a county assessor’s office in the program under the following circumstances:

(1) If the program activities of the assessor’s office have not met the benchmarks specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and if the Director of Finance believes the assessor’s office does not have a viable plan for performing additional assessment activities that will meet those benchmarks in the next fiscal year.

(2) If the program funds were expended for purposes not authorized in subdivision (f), or as otherwise approved by the Department of Finance pursuant to that subdivision.

(3) If the Director of Finance believes that the county’s participation is no longer in the best fiscal or policy interest of the state or of the affected
 taxing entities.

(j) Upon the request of the Department of Finance, participating county assessors’ offices shall provide the Department of Finance with any supplemental information necessary to substantiate the information contained in the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(k) No later than May 8, 2017, the Department of Finance shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee with a report that, at a minimum, includes the following information for each county and for each fiscal year that the program was in operation:

(1) The assessed value of properties enrolled pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the assessed value of properties enrolled using the
 information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(2) The increase in assessed value of properties reassessed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value of properties reassessed using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(3) The total value of the supplemental assessments levied pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the value of the supplemental assessments levied using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(4) The increase in assessed value of properties reassessed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value of properties reassessed using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(5) The increase in assessed value associated with escaped assessments enrolled pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value associated with escaped assessments enrolled using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(6) The increase in assessed value associated with properties reassessed pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value associated with properties reassessed using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(7) The number of assessment appeals successfully responded to pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds, and the amount of assessed value retained on the roll as a result. For purposes of this paragraph, “successfully responded to” means the assessment appeals board did not reduce the assessed value to that claimed by the appellant.

(8) The increase in assessed value associated with
 property tax audits pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value associated with escaped assessments enrolled using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(9) The increase in assessed value associated with the discovery of previously unassessed property pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f), using program funds and county matching funds. If applicable, the Department of Finance shall separately report the increase in assessed value associated with escaped assessments enrolled using the information technology systems and software identified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(10) An estimate of the countywide property tax revenue
 resulting from the assessed valuation increases identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, and paragraphs (8) and (9).

(11) An estimate of the countywide property tax revenue that was retained as a result of the appeals workload identified in paragraph (7).

(12) An estimate of the amount of revenue identified in paragraphs (10) and (11) that accrued to the following entities:

(A) K–12 school districts.

(B) California Community College districts.

(C) County Offices of Education.

(13) A determination as to whether the program succeeded according to the criteria specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), and a
 recommendation as to whether the program should be continued in its current form, expanded to include additional county assessors’ offices, or terminated in the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(l) The Legislature finds and declares there is a compelling public interest in allowing the Department of Finance to implement and administer the provisions of this section as expeditiously as possible, and to thereby accelerate countywide equalization efforts. The Department of Finance is therefore exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) for the express purpose of carrying out the duties in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 135.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

95.50.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the state and local governments benefit when county assessors are able to fairly, accurately, and expeditiously assess property for property tax purposes. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to assist county assessors in performing property assessments.

(b) For the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive, there is hereby created the State Supplementation for County Assessors Program, hereinafter referred to as the “Program” in this section, to be administered by the Department of Finance, hereinafter referred to as the “department” in this section.

(1) Program funding shall be subject to
 appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(2) (A) In each fiscal year in which it receives program funds, a participating county assessor’s office shall match the Program funds apportioned to that county assessor’s office, at the rate of one dollar ($1) for every two dollars ($2) in Program funds that the county assessor’s office receives in Program funds.

(B) If a county assessor’s office authorized to participate in the Program pursuant to subdivision (f) fails to provide matching funds as required by this paragraph, the county assessor’s office shall, within 30 days of an order by the department to do so, return to the State Controller’s office all Program funds it received in the fiscal year during which it did not provide matching funds.

(3) Program funds provided to participating county
 assessors shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funding and staffing levels.

(c) All counties shall be eligible to apply to participate in the Program. The department shall annually apportion to an individual county no more than 15 percent of the amount appropriated for the Program in the Budget Act for the relevant fiscal year.

(d) County assessors’ offices shall use Program funds only for the following purposes:

(1) The payment of salaries and benefits to the county assessor’s office staff for the following activities:

(A) Assessing and enrolling newly constructed real property.

(B) Reassessing real property that has changed ownership.

(C) Processing supplemental assessments for real property that has changed ownership.

(D) Reassessing existing real property that has been modified in a way that changes its current assessed value.

(E) Reassessing real and personal property that has escaped assessment, as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 531) of Chapter 3 of Part 2.

(F) Reassessing to current market value those real properties for which the county assessor previously reduced the assessed valuation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(G) Discovering unassessed real and personal property.
